Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5710
Investment, defined.

Investment means the value of qualified property incorporated into or used at the project. For qualified property owned by the taxpayer, the value shall be the original cost of the property. For qualified property rented by the taxpayer, the average net annual rent shall be multiplied by the number of years of the lease for which the taxpayer was originally bound, not to exceed ten years. The rental of land included in and incidental to the leasing of a building shall not be excluded from the computation.

Laws 2005, LB 312, § 32.